New York, session 2025-2026, S8045.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 577 2 to read as follows: 3 § 577. Informational materials on harassment through smart home 4 systems. 1. (a) In furtherance of the activities required in subdivision 5 three of section five hundred seventy-five of this article and within 6 amounts appropriated for such purpose, the office shall contract with an 7 organization designated by the federal department of health and human 8 services to coordinate statewide improvements within local communities, 9 social services systems, and programming regarding the prevention and 10 intervention of domestic violence in New York state to mutually develop 11 and promote information materials, including online resources and phys- 12 ical pamphlets for victims of domestic violence facing harassment 13 through smart home systems. 14 (b) Such resources shall include, but not be limited to, information 15 on devices commonly used to harass victims, the tactics commonly used to 16 harass victims, ways in which victims can enhance their safety with 17 respect to harassment through smart home systems and instructions for 18 removing an individual's access to a smart home system. Further, the 19 contracted organization shall make recommendations on policies and 20 priorities for reducing technology-facilitated abuse, including but not 21 limited to, harassment through safe home systems, cyber-harassment and 22 stalking. 23 (c) For the purposes of this section, "smart home system" shall mean 24 any electronic device or technology installed directly into the home EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06383-06-5 S. 8045 2 1 which handles the security, climate and/or appliances in the home, that 2 is capable of connecting to the internet, directly or indirectly, that 3 is assigned an internet protocol address or bluetooth address, and has 4 computer processing capabilities for collecting, sending, receiving, or 5 analyzing data. 6 2. The informational materials required pursuant to subdivision one of 7 this section shall be provided by the office to domestic violence shel- 8 ters, local social services districts, local police departments, and 9 local childcare facilities to be distributed to potential victims of 10 domestic violence. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 12 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 13 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 14 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 15 on or before such date.